Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-916
Mental health board; training; department; duties.

(1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide appropriate training to members and alternate members of each mental health board and shall consult with consumer and family advocacy groups in the development and presentation of such training. Members and alternate members shall be reimbursed for any actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending such training in a manner and amount determined by the presiding judge of the district court. No person shall remain on a mental health board or be eligible for appointment or reappointment as a member or alternate member of such board unless he or she has attended and satisfactorily completed such training pursuant to rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

(2) The department shall provide the mental health boards with blanks for warrants, certificates, and other forms and printed copies of applicable rules and regulations of the department that will enable the boards to carry out their powers and duties under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act.

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 36;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 35;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 461.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.